Utah statutes.
59-1-306.   Definition -- State Tax Commission Administrative Charge Account -- Amount of administrative charge -- Deposit of revenues into the restricted account -- Interest deposited into General Fund -- Expenditure of money deposited into the restricted account.

(1)  As used in this section, "qualifying tax, fee, or charge" means a tax, fee, or charge the commission administers under:

(a)  Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act, other than a tax under Chapter 12, Part 1, Tax Collection, or Chapter 12, Part 18, Additional State Sales and Use Tax Act;

(b)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 3, Municipal Energy Sales and Use Tax Act;

(c)  Title 10, Chapter 1, Part 4, Municipal Telecommunications License Tax Act;

(d)  Section 19-6-714;

(e)  Section 19-6-805;

(f)  Section 59-27-105;

(g)  Section 69-2-5;

(h)  Section 69-2-5.5; or

(i)  Section 69-2-5.6.

(2)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "State Tax Commission Administrative Charge Account."

(3)  Subject to the other provisions of this section, the restricted account shall consist of administrative charges the commission retains and deposits in accordance with this section.

(4)  For purposes of this section, the administrative charge is a percentage of revenues the commission collects from each qualifying tax, fee, or charge of not to exceed the lesser of:

(a)  1.5%; or

(b)  an equal percentage of revenues the commission collects from each qualifying tax, fee, or charge sufficient to cover the cost to the commission of administering the qualifying taxes, fees, or charges.

(5)  The commission shall deposit an administrative charge into the restricted account.

(6)  Interest earned on the restricted account shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(7)  The commission shall expend money appropriated by the Legislature to the commission from the restricted account to administer qualifying taxes, fees, or charges.

